Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2371.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) Notwithstanding section 201(k)(19) or (o)(18), the sale at retail or use of mobile telecommunications service during the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 exclusion period if the purchase is pursuant to a service contract between the service provider and a customer and if the service contract requires the customer to make periodic payments to maintain the mobile telecommunications service. For the purposes of this clause, the term "exclusion period" means the time period beginning with the first day of the first full month after the effective date of this clause and ending on the first day after the end of the sixth full month after the effective date of this clause.Section 2. Section 1101(a) introductory paragraph and (h) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1101. Imposition of Tax.--(a) General Rule.--[Every] Except as provided under subsection (a.2), every pipeline company, conduit company, steamboat company, canal company, slack water navigation company, transportation company, and every other company, association, joint-stock association, or limited partnership, now or hereafter incorporated or organized by or under any law of this Commonwealth, or now or hereafter organized or incorporated by any other state or by the United States or any foreign government, and doing business in this Commonwealth, and every copartnership, person or persons owing, operating or leasing to or from another corporation, company, association, joint-stock association, limited partnership, copartnership, person or persons, any pipeline, conduit, steamboat, canal, slack water navigation, or other device for the transportation of freight, passengers, baggage, or oil, except motor vehicles and railroads, and every limited partnership, association, joint-stock association, corporation or company engaged in, or hereinafter engaged in, the 20260HB2371PN3160 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transportation of freight or oil within this State, and every telephone company, telegraph company or provider of mobile telecommunications services now or hereafter incorporated or organized by or under any law of this Commonwealth, or now or hereafter organized or incorporated by any other state or by the United States or any foreign government and doing business in this Commonwealth, and every limited partnership, association, joint-stock association, copartnership, person or persons, engaged in telephone or telegraph business or providing mobile telecommunications services in this Commonwealth, shall pay to the State Treasurer, through the Department of Revenue, a tax of forty-five mills with a surtax equal to five mills upon each dollar of the gross receipts of the corporation, company or association, limited partnership, joint-stock association, copartnership, person or persons received from:* * *(a.2) Holiday.--Beginning with the first day of the first full month after the effective date of this subsection and ending on the first day after the end of the sixth full month after the effective date of this subsection, the rate of tax under section 1101(a) for gross receipts received from providing mobile telecommunications services shall be zero mills.* * *(h) Benefits to Consumer.--(1) For purposes of this article, the reduction in the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) shall derive to the benefit of the consumer purchasing services from said utilities. Said benefit shall be provided in the form of a reduction in the State tax surcharge. Failure to pass through the reduction to the consumer shall subject the public utility to a civil penalty 20260HB2371PN3160 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and such additional relief as the court may deem appropriate.(2) For purposes of this article, the entire benefit of the tax holiday under subsection (a.2) shall derive to the benefit of the consumer purchasing services from providers of mobile telecommunications services. Said benefit shall be provided in the form of the elimination of the State tax surcharge, which shall be clearly reflected in each consumer's bill. Failure to pass through the entire benefit of the tax holiday to the consumer shall subject the provider of the mobile telecommunications services to a civil penalty of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and such additional relief as the court may deem appropriate.* * *Section 3. For the purposes of implementing the tax holiday under section 1101(a.2) of the act, a person subject to the tax under section 1101(a) of the act shall separately report its monthly gross receipts received from providing mobile telecommunications services subject to tax under section 1101(a) of the act to the Department of Revenue and shall not be taxed upon gross receipts received during said months if the requirements of section 1101(h)(2) of the act are satisfied.Section 4. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the transfer of money from the tax under Article XI of the act under section 6 of the act of November 29, 2004 (P.L.1376, No.178), known as the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act, shall be no less than the amount transferred under section 6 of the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.20260HB2371PN3160 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2371PN3160 - 5 - 12